Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1122.
do enact as follows:AB1122,11Section 1. 344.57 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1122,2,52344.57 (3m) “Negligent vehicle management” includes failure to possess the 3ignition key furnished by the rental company at the time of theft, leaving the 4vehicle’s ignition running while not being in the vehicle at the time of the theft, or 5failure to comply with the terms of the rental agreement at the time of the theft.AB1122,26Section 2. 344.574 (1) (a) 3. (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 344.574 (1) 7(a) 3. and amended to read:AB1122,2,108344.574 (1) (a) 3. Theft of the private passenger vehicle intentionally caused 9by the renter. A renter is presumed not to have caused the theft intentionally if all 10of the following apply:.AB1122,311Section 3. 344.574 (1) (a) 3. a. and b. of the statutes are repealed.AB1122,412Section 4. 344.576 (2) (k) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1122,3,413344.576 (2) (k) The damage occurs while the private passenger vehicle is 1operated by someone other than an authorized driver as defined in s. 344.57 (2). 2This paragraph does not apply if the vehicle has been lost or a theft has occurred 3and the renter is presumed to have not caused the theft or loss intentionally under 4s. 344.574 (1) (a) 3.AB1122,55Section 5. 344.576 (2) (L) of the statutes is created to read:AB1122,3,76344.576 (2) (L) 1. The damage occurs due to theft of the private passenger 7vehicle if any of the following criteria are present:AB1122,3,98a. The theft is caused by the intentional conduct or negligent vehicle 9management of the renter or any authorized driver of the vehicle.AB1122,3,1110b. The renter fails to file an official report of the theft with a law enforcement 11agency within 24 hours of learning of the theft.AB1122,3,1312c. The renter fails to reasonably cooperate with a rental company or law 13enforcement agency investigation of the theft.AB1122,614Section 6. 344.579 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1122,3,2015344.579 (3) Defense. Proof by a rental company that the rental company 16began an action to impose liability upon a renter or authorized driver, even though 17the renter had purchased a damage waiver sold under s. 344.576, because of a good-18faith mistake that an exception under s. 344.576 (2) (a) to (k) (L) applied is a defense 19to a prosecution for a violation of the terms of the damage waiver under s. 344.576 20(2).AB1122,721Section 7. 943.123 of the statutes is created to read:AB1122,3,2222943.123 Motor vehicle entry devices. (1) In this section:AB1122,4,323(a) “Motor vehicle key programming or emulating device” means any device, 24computer program, application, or software designed or used to electronically 1communicate with a motor vehicle for the purpose of programming or emulating a 2motor vehicle key fob that is capable of being used to unlock or start the motor 3vehicle.AB1122,4,64(b) “Relay attack device” means any device, computer program, application, or 5software designed or used to intercept the signal from the key fob of a motor vehicle 6to unlock or start the motor vehicle.AB1122,4,107(2) Whoever manufactures, sells, offers to sell, transfers, possesses, or 8permits another to use a motor vehicle key programming or emulating device or 9relay attack device with intent that the device be used to commit a crime is guilty of 10a Class I felony.AB1122,4,1511(3) A person who is authorized to possess a motor vehicle key programming or 12emulating device or relay attack device for any legitimate purpose shall report a lost 13or stolen motor vehicle key programming or emulating device or relay attack device 14to law enforcement within 48 hours of becoming aware that the device was lost or 15stolen. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a Class I felony.AB1122,4,1616